Maine, session 132, LD1182.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1951, c. 108, §1, as amended by P&SL 1957, c. 78, §1, is further
amended to read:
Sec. 1. Rockland Port District, incorporated. The inhabitants of and the
territory within the city of Rockland, in the county of Knox, are hereby created a body
politic and corporate under the name of "Rockland Port District" for the purpose of
purchasing, maintaining and operating within said district wharves, landing places and all
other appurtenances necessary for the operation of an adequate passenger and freight
transportation service by water and of sustainable aquaculture and marine industries.
Sec. 2. P&SL 1951, c. 108, §4, as amended by P&SL 2003, c. 7, §1, is further
amended to read:
Sec. 4. How financed. To procure funds for the purposes of this act, and for such
other expenses as may be necessary to carry out said purposes, the said district, by its
trustees, is hereby authorized from time to time to borrow money and to issue its bonds or
notes therefor, but shall may not incur a total indebtedness at any one time outstanding
exceeding the sum of $600,000 $6,000,000. Said bonds may be issued to mature serially
or for such periods as the trustees may determine. If the former, provisions shall must be
made for the retirement of not less than 7 1/2% of the total issue annually after the first 2
years. If the latter, a sinking fund equal to at least 7 1/2% of the total issue shall must be
set up annually after the first 2 years. Each bond and note shall must have inscribed upon
its face the words "Rockland Port District," shall must bear interest at such rates as the
trustees shall may determine, payable semiannually, and shall be is subject to such other
provisions as the trustees shall may determine. Bonds and notes issued by said district may
be made callable with or without premium on any interest date. All notes or bonds issued
by said district shall must be signed by the treasurer and countersigned by the president of
said district and if coupon bonds be issued, each coupon shall must be attested by the
facsimile signature of the treasurer printed thereon. Said bonds and notes shall be are legal
Page 1 - 132LR1216(03)

obligations of said district, which is hereby declared to be a quasi-municipal corporation
within the meaning of section 136 of chapter 53 of the Revised Statutes of 1954, and all
the provisions of said section shall be are applicable thereto. The said bonds and notes
shall be are legal investments for trust companies and savings banks.
Sec. 3. P&SL 1951, c. 108, §5, as repealed and replaced by P&SL 1957, c. 78, §3,
is amended to read:
Sec. 5. Powers. The district, through its trustees, is hereby authorized and
empowered to acquire by purchase, lease or take by the exercise of the right of eminent
domain, as hereinafter provided, or otherwise, and hold any land or real estate or easement
therein or wharf or dock and to do all that is necessary or desirable to establish, maintain
and operate in the district adequate commercial docking and wharf facilities in the district
and any facilities considered necessary to support sustainable aquaculture and marine
industries. All of such property, wherever located, shall be is exempt from taxation;
provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall may be construed as authorizing
said district to take by right of eminent domain any of the property or facilities of the city
of Rockland or of any other public service corporation or district used or acquired for
further use by the owner thereof in performance of a public duty unless expressly
authorized thereto by subsequent act of the Legislature.
Sec. 4. P&SL 1951, c. 108, §6-A, as enacted by P&SL 1957, c. 78, §5, is amended
to read:
Sec. 6-A. Authority to receive property from the city of Rockland. The city
of Rockland is hereby authorized to sell and convey to said district any property, real,
personal or mixed, now or hereafter owned or held by said city of Rockland for commercial
docking and wharf facilities used in connection with passenger and freight transportation
service by water or for facilities capable of supporting sustainable aquaculture or marine
industries and any sum or sums of money which that the city of Rockland may raise either
by taxation or otherwise to be used for such purposes by said district.
Page 2 - 132LR1216(03)